Nebraska, session 109, LB628.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB628 LB628
2025 2025
Section 1. Sections 1 to 6 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Recreational Trail Easement Property Tax Exemption Act.
Sec. 2. The Legislature finds and declares that the purpose of the
Recreational Trail Easement Property Tax Exemption Act is to serve a
public purpose by:
(1) Promoting public health and wellness through access to
recreational trails;
(2) Encouraging economic development and tourism by expanding
regional and state trail systems;
(3) Supporting environmental conservation by protecting and
maintaining open spaces for recreational use; and
(4) Enhancing connectivity between communities, cultural landmarks,
and natural resources to provide equitable access for all Nebraskans.
Sec. 3. For purposes of the Recreational Trail Easement Property
Tax Exemption Act:
(1) Eligible holder means:
(a) A municipality, county, or a land trust accredited by the Land
Trust Alliance authorized to hold recreational trail easements within the
State of Nebraska; or
(b) A nonprofit organization with a mission explicitly aligned with
public access, recreational land conservation, and community benefit,
authorized to hold recreational trail easements within the State of
Nebraska; and
(2) Recreational trail easement means a perpetual easement granting
public access for nonmotorized recreational use, including, but not
limited to, walking, hiking, bicycling, and equestrian activities.
Sec. 4. (1) A taxpayer who encumbers their property with a
perpetual recreational trail easement is eligible for an annual property
tax exemption equal to ten cents for each square foot of the property
encumbered by the easement.
(2) If the exemption amount exceeds the taxpayer's property tax
-2-

LB628 LB628
2025 2025
liability for the taxable year, the excess amount may not be carried
forward to subsequent years.
Sec. 5. (1) To qualify for the property tax exemption:
(a) The easement shall:
(i) Be perpetual and recorded with the appropriate county register
of deeds;
(ii) Provide public access and connect to existing or planned
regional trails or significant local attractions, such as parks,
waterways, cultural sites, or residential areas; and
(iii) Be held by an eligible holder, including nonprofit
organizations that demonstrate:
(A) A primary mission of promoting public access, health, and
wellness through recreational land use;
(B) A commitment to environmental conservation and land stewardship;
and
(C) Capacity to oversee and manage trail easements independently or
through partnerships with accredited entities, ensuring compliance with
public access goals; and
(b) Taxpayers shall submit an application to the Department of
Revenue, including:
(i) Proof of the recorded easement; and
(ii) Certification from the eligible holder confirming compliance
with public access and connectivity requirements.
(2) Upon verification of the qualification for the property tax
exemption, the Department of Revenue shall issue a property tax exemption
certificate to the taxpayer.
Sec. 6. The Department of Revenue shall adopt and promulgate rules
and regulations necessary to carry out the Recreational Trail Easement
Property Tax Exemption Act. Such rules and regulations shall include:
(1) Clear guidelines for nonprofit organizations to demonstrate
their eligibility as holders of recreational trail easements, ensuring
-3-

LB628 LB628
2025 2025
alignment with public access and conservation goals;
(2) Procedures for certifying the public benefit of qualifying
easements, including requirements for connectivity to existing or planned
trail systems; and
(3) Methods for ensuring compliance with the public purpose outlined
in the act.
Sec. 7. Section 76-214, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
76-214 (1) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section,
every grantee who has a deed to real estate recorded and every purchaser
of real estate who has a memorandum of contract or land contract recorded
shall, at the time such deed, memorandum of contract, or land contract is
presented for recording, file with the register of deeds a completed
statement as prescribed by the Tax Commissioner. For all deeds and all
memoranda of contract and land contracts recorded on and after January 1,
2001, the statement shall not require the social security number of the
grantee or purchaser or the federal employer identification number of the
grantee or purchaser. This statement may require the recitation of any
information contained in the deed, memorandum of contract, or land
contract, the total consideration paid, the amount of the total
consideration attributable to factors other than the purchase of the real
estate itself, and other factors which may influence the transaction. If
a death certificate is recorded as provided in subsection (2) of this
section, this statement may require a date of death, the name of the
decedent, and whether the title is affected as a result of a transfer on
death deed, a joint tenancy deed, or the expiration of a life estate or
by any other means. This statement shall ask whether the affidavit
described in section 76-2,141 is required with respect to the deed,
memorandum of contract, or land contract and, if so, whether such
affidavit has been completed. This statement shall be signed and filed by
the grantee, the purchaser, or his or her authorized agent. The register
-4-

LB628 LB628
2025 2025
of deeds shall forward the statement to the county assessor. If the
grantee or purchaser fails to furnish the prescribed statement, the
register of deeds shall not record the deed, memorandum of contract, or
land contract. The register of deeds shall indicate on the statement the
book and page or computer system reference where the deed, memorandum of
contract, or land contract is recorded and shall immediately forward the
statement to the county assessor. The county assessor shall process the
statement according to the instructions of the Property Tax Administrator
and shall, pursuant to the rules and regulations of the Tax Commissioner,
forward the statement to the Tax Commissioner.
(2)(a) The statement described in subsection (1) of this section
shall be filed at the time that a certified or authenticated copy of the
grantor's death certificate is filed if such death certificate is
required to be filed under section 76-2,126 and the conveyance of real
estate was pursuant to a transfer on death deed.
(b) The statement described in subsection (1) of this section shall
not be required to be filed at the time that a transfer on death deed is
filed or at the time that an instrument of revocation of a transfer on
death deed as described in subdivision (a)(1)(B) of section 76-3413 is
filed.
(3) Any person shall have access to the statements at the office of
the Tax Commissioner, county assessor, or register of deeds if the
statements are available and have not been disposed of pursuant to the
records retention and disposition schedule as approved by the State
Records Administrator.
(4) The statement described in subsection (1) of this section shall
not be required if the document being recorded is an easement or an oil,
gas, or mineral lease, or any subsequent assignment of an easement or
such lease, except that such statement shall be required for conservation
easements and preservation easements as such terms are defined in section
76-2,111 and easements used to qualify for the property tax exemption
-5-

LB628 LB628
2025 2025
provided by the Recreational Trail Easement Property Tax Exemption Act.
Sec. 8. Section 77-202, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-202 (1) The following property shall be exempt from property
taxes:
(a) Property of the state and its governmental subdivisions to the
extent used or being developed for use by the state or governmental
subdivision for a public purpose. For purposes of this subdivision:
(i) Property of the state and its governmental subdivisions means
(A) property held in fee title by the state or a governmental subdivision
or (B) property beneficially owned by the state or a governmental
subdivision in that it is used for a public purpose and is being acquired
under a lease-purchase agreement, financing lease, or other instrument
which provides for transfer of legal title to the property to the state
or a governmental subdivision upon payment of all amounts due thereunder.
If the property to be beneficially owned by a governmental subdivision
has a total acquisition cost that exceeds the threshold amount or will be
used as the site of a public building with a total estimated construction
cost that exceeds the threshold amount, then such property shall qualify
for an exemption under this section only if the question of acquiring
such property or constructing such public building has been submitted at
a primary, general, or special election held within the governmental
subdivision and has been approved by the voters of the governmental
subdivision. For purposes of this subdivision, threshold amount means the
greater of fifty thousand dollars or six-tenths of one percent of the
total actual value of real and personal property of the governmental
subdivision that will beneficially own the property as of the end of the
governmental subdivision's prior fiscal year; and
(ii) Public purpose means use of the property (A) to provide public
services with or without cost to the recipient, including the general
operation of government, public education, public safety, transportation,
-6-

LB628 LB628
2025 2025
public works, civil and criminal justice, public health and welfare,
developments by a public housing authority, parks, culture, recreation,
community development, and cemetery purposes, or (B) to carry out the
duties and responsibilities conferred by law with or without
consideration. Public purpose does not include leasing of property to a
private party unless the lease of the property is at fair market value
for a public purpose. Leases of property by a public housing authority to
low-income individuals as a place of residence are for the authority's
public purpose;
(b) Unleased property of the state or its governmental subdivisions
which is not being used or developed for use for a public purpose but
upon which a payment in lieu of taxes is paid for public safety, rescue,
and emergency services and road or street construction or maintenance
services to all governmental units providing such services to the
property. Except as provided in Article VIII, section 11, of the
Constitution of Nebraska, the payment in lieu of taxes shall be based on
the proportionate share of the cost of providing public safety, rescue,
or emergency services and road or street construction or maintenance
services unless a general policy is adopted by the governing body of the
governmental subdivision providing such services which provides for a
different method of determining the amount of the payment in lieu of
taxes. The governing body may adopt a general policy by ordinance or
resolution for determining the amount of payment in lieu of taxes by
majority vote after a hearing on the ordinance or resolution. Such
ordinance or resolution shall nevertheless result in an equitable
contribution for the cost of providing such services to the exempt
property;
(c) Property owned by and used exclusively for agricultural and
horticultural societies;
(d)(i) Property owned by educational, religious, charitable, or
cemetery organizations, or any organization for the exclusive benefit of
-7-

LB628 LB628
2025 2025
any such educational, religious, charitable, or cemetery organization,
and used exclusively for educational, religious, charitable, or cemetery
purposes, when such property is not (A) owned or used for financial gain
or profit to either the owner or user, (B) used for the sale of alcoholic
liquors for more than twenty hours per week, or (C) owned or used by an
organization which discriminates in membership or employment based on
race, color, or national origin.
(ii) For purposes of subdivision (1)(d) of this section:
(A) Educational organization means (I) an institution operated
exclusively for the purpose of offering regular courses with systematic
instruction in academic, vocational, or technical subjects or assisting
students through services relating to the origination, processing, or
guarantying of federally reinsured student loans for higher education,
(II) a museum or historical society operated exclusively for the benefit
and education of the public, or (III) a nonprofit organization that owns
or operates a child care facility; and
(B) Charitable organization includes (I) an organization operated
exclusively for the purpose of the mental, social, or physical benefit of
the public or an indefinite number of persons and (II) a fraternal
benefit society organized and licensed under sections 44-1072 to
44-10,109.
(iii) The property tax exemption authorized in subdivision (1)(d)(i)
of this section shall apply to any skilled nursing facility as defined in
section 71-429, nursing facility as defined in section 71-424, or
assisted-living facility as defined in section 71-5903 that provides
housing for medicaid beneficiaries, except that the exemption amount for
such property shall be a percentage of the property taxes that would
otherwise be due. Such percentage shall be equal to the average
percentage of occupied beds in the facility provided to medicaid
beneficiaries over the most recent three-year period.
(iv) The property tax exemption authorized in subdivision (1)(d)(i)
-8-

LB628 LB628
2025 2025
of this section shall apply to a building that (A) is owned by a
charitable organization, (B) is made available to students in attendance
at an educational institution, and (C) is recognized by such educational
institution as approved student housing, except that the exemption shall
only apply to the commons area of such building, including any common
rooms and cooking and eating facilities; and
(e) Household goods and personal effects not owned or used for
financial gain or profit to either the owner or user; and .
(f) A portion of the property owned by a taxpayer as provided in the
Recreational Trail Easement Property Tax Exemption Act.
(2) The increased value of land by reason of shade and ornamental
trees planted along the highway shall not be taken into account in the
valuation of land.
(3) Tangible personal property which is not depreciable tangible
personal property as defined in section 77-119 shall be exempt from
property tax.
(4) Motor vehicles, trailers, and semitrailers required to be
registered for operation on the highways of this state shall be exempt
from payment of property taxes.
(5) Business and agricultural inventory shall be exempt from the
personal property tax. For purposes of this subsection, business
inventory includes personal property owned for purposes of leasing or
renting such property to others for financial gain only if the personal
property is of a type which in the ordinary course of business is leased
or rented thirty days or less and may be returned at the option of the
lessee or renter at any time and the personal property is of a type which
would be considered household goods or personal effects if owned by an
individual. All other personal property owned for purposes of leasing or
renting such property to others for financial gain shall not be
considered business inventory.
(6) Any personal property exempt pursuant to subsection (2) of
-9-

LB628 LB628
2025 2025
section 77-4105 or section 77-5209.02 shall be exempt from the personal
property tax.
(7) Livestock shall be exempt from the personal property tax.
(8) Any personal property exempt pursuant to the Nebraska Advantage
Act or the ImagiNE Nebraska Act shall be exempt from the personal
property tax.
(9) Any depreciable tangible personal property used directly in the
generation of electricity using wind as the fuel source shall be exempt
from the property tax levied on depreciable tangible personal property.
Any depreciable tangible personal property used directly in the
generation of electricity using solar, biomass, or landfill gas as the
fuel source shall be exempt from the property tax levied on depreciable
tangible personal property if such depreciable tangible personal property
was installed on or after January 1, 2016, and has a nameplate capacity
of one hundred kilowatts or more. Depreciable tangible personal property
used directly in the generation of electricity using wind, solar,
biomass, or landfill gas as the fuel source includes, but is not limited
to, wind turbines, rotors and blades, towers, solar panels, trackers,
generating equipment, transmission components, substations, supporting
structures or racks, inverters, and other system components such as
wiring, control systems, switchgears, and generator step-up transformers.
(10) Any tangible personal property that is acquired by a person
operating a data center located in this state, that is assembled,
engineered, processed, fabricated, manufactured into, attached to, or
incorporated into other tangible personal property, both in component
form or that of an assembled product, for the purpose of subsequent use
at a physical location outside this state by the person operating a data
center shall be exempt from the personal property tax. Such exemption
extends to keeping, retaining, or exercising any right or power over
tangible personal property in this state for the purpose of subsequently
transporting it outside this state for use thereafter outside this state.
-10-

LB628 LB628
2025 2025
For purposes of this subsection, data center means computers, supporting
equipment, and other organized assembly of hardware or software that are
designed to centralize the storage, management, or dissemination of data
and information, environmentally controlled structures or facilities or
interrelated structures or facilities that provide the infrastructure for
housing the equipment, such as raised flooring, electricity supply,
communication and data lines, Internet access, cooling, security, and
fire suppression, and any building housing the foregoing.
(11) For tax years prior to tax year 2020, each person who owns
property required to be reported to the county assessor under section
77-1201 shall be allowed an exemption amount as provided in the Personal
Property Tax Relief Act. For tax years prior to tax year 2020, each
person who owns property required to be valued by the state as provided
in section 77-601, 77-682, 77-801, or 77-1248 shall be allowed a
compensating exemption factor as provided in the Personal Property Tax
Relief Act.
(12)(a) Broadband equipment shall be exempt from the personal
property tax if such broadband equipment is:
(i) Deployed in an area funded in whole or in part by funds from the
Broadband Equity, Access, and Deployment Program, authorized by the
federal Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act, Public Law 117-58; or
(ii) Deployed in a qualified census tract located within the
corporate limits of a city of the metropolitan class and being utilized
to provide end-users with access to the Internet at speeds of at least
one hundred megabits per second for downloading and at least one hundred
megabits per second for uploading.
(b) An owner of broadband equipment seeking an exemption under this
section shall apply for an exemption to the county assessor on or before
December 31 of the year preceding the year for which the exemption is to
begin. If the broadband equipment meets the criteria described in this
subsection, the county assessor shall approve the application within
-11-

LB628 LB628
2025 2025
thirty calendar days after receiving the application. The application
shall be on forms prescribed by the Tax Commissioner.
(c) For purposes of this subsection:
(i) Broadband communications service means telecommunications
service as defined in section 86-121, video programming as defined in 47
U.S.C. 522, as such section existed on January 1, 2024, or Internet
access as defined in section 1104 of the federal Internet Tax Freedom
Act, Public Law 105-277;
(ii) Broadband equipment means machinery or equipment used to
provide broadband communications service and includes, but is not limited
to, wires, cables, fiber, conduits, antennas, poles, switches, routers,
amplifiers, rectifiers, repeaters, receivers, multiplexers, duplexers,
transmitters, circuit cards, insulating and protective materials and
cases, power equipment, backup power equipment, diagnostic equipment,
storage devices, modems, and other general central office or headend
equipment, such as channel cards, frames, and cabinets, or equipment used
in successor technologies, including items used to monitor, test,
maintain, enable, or facilitate qualifying equipment, machinery,
software, ancillary components, appurtenances, accessories, or other
infrastructure that is used in whole or in part to provide broadband
communications service. Machinery or equipment used to produce broadband
communications service does not include personal consumer electronics,
including, but not limited to, smartphones, computers, and tablets; and
(iii) Qualified census tract means a qualified census tract as
defined in 26 U.S.C. 42(d)(5)(B)(ii)(I), as such section existed on
January 1, 2024.
Sec. 9. This act becomes operative on January 1, 2026.
Sec. 10. Original sections 76-214 and 77-202, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-12-